Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-10] Review by employee. Employees
offered a severance benefit or a special retirement benefit shall be given
sufficient time to make an informed decision from the date of receiving
accurate and complete information about the offer. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next